Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.040

Violation—Application of chapter 19.86 RCW.

The legislature finds that allowing a subscriber to opt out of a reverse phone number search service vitally affects the public interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of RCW 19.250.030 by a provider of a reverse phone number search service is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2008 c 271 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: See note following RCW 19.250.005.